Vermont statutes. Title 19 Highways
Chapter 25. Scenic Roads

§ 2501.
State Scenic Roads and Byways; designation and discontinuance.

On the recommendation of the municipalities through which a proposed or existing State Scenic Road or Byway passes and of the regional planning commissions that serve such municipalities, the Transportation Board may designate or discontinue any State highway, or portion of a State highway, as a State Scenic Road or Byway, in accordance with standards adopted by the Board by rule. The Board shall hold a public hearing on the recommendation, giving notice thereof to the municipalities and regional planning commissions, the Secretary, and the Commissioner of Tourism and Marketing, and shall submit a copy of its findings and decision to these parties within 60 days after receipt of the recommendation. The hearing shall be held in the vicinity of the proposed State Scenic Road or Byway.

[Repealed.]

A State Scenic Road or Byway shall not be reconstructed or improved unless the reconstruction or improvement is conducted in accordance with the Agency of Transportation’s Vermont Design Standards, as amended. Signs along State Scenic Roads and Byways shall comply with the Federal Highway Administration’s Manual on Uniform Traffic Control Devices, as amended.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1989, No. 246

(Adj. Sess.), § 24;

1995, No. 190

(Adj. Sess.), § 1(a);

2011, No. 62

, § 23;

2011, No. 139

(Adj. Sess.), § 51(h), eff. May 14, 2012;

2015, No. 40

, § 29.

§ 2502.
Town scenic roads; designation and discontinuance.

On recommendation of the planning commission of a municipality, or on the initiative of the legislative body of a municipality, a legislative body may, after one public hearing warned for the purpose, designate or discontinue any town highway or portion of a town highway as a town scenic road. Such action by the legislative body may be petitioned by the registered voters of the municipality pursuant to the provisions of

24 V.S.A. § 1973

.

A town scenic road may be reconstructed or improved in a manner consistent with the Agency’s Vermont Design Standards, as amended. A class 1, 2, or 3 scenic road shall still be eligible to receive aid pursuant to the provisions of this title. Signs along town scenic roads shall comply with the Federal Highway Administration’s Manual on Uniform Traffic Control Devices, as amended.

[Repealed.]

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

2011, No. 62

, § 24;

2015, No. 40

, § 29.

§ 2503.
Register.

The Agency may annually publish a register containing a listing of all State and locally designated scenic roads and byways. Any listing shall include the mileage of each road or byway and any special, natural, historical, or scenic attractions on the road or byway.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

2015, No. 40

, § 29.

§ 2504.
Additional funds.

The Agency, and any qualifying municipality, within the authority of State and federal law, may accept and spend any funds made available to them for the purpose of enhancing or establishing designated scenic roads or byways.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1989, No. 246

(Adj. Sess.), § 25;

2015, No. 40

, § 29.

§ 2505.
Rights of adjacent landowners.

Nothing in this chapter shall preclude the rights of a landowner from developing property adjacent to a designated scenic road or byway, so long as the development is in accordance with existing law or ordinance.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

2015, No. 40

, § 29.